Washington statutes.
RCW 36.67.560

Funding and refunding.

(1) The county legislative authority of any county may by resolution, from time to time, provide for the issuance of funding or refunding revenue bonds to fund or refund any outstanding revenue bonds and any interest and premiums due thereon at or before the maturity of such bonds, and parts or all of various series and issues of outstanding revenue bonds in the amount thereof to be funded or refunded. Such bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

The county legislative authority shall create a special fund for the sole purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such funding or refunding revenue bonds, into which fund the legislative authority shall obligate and bind the county to set aside and pay any part or parts of, or all of, or a fixed proportion of, or a fixed amount of the revenue of the facility of the county sufficient to pay such principal and interest as the same shall become due, and if deemed necessary to maintain adequate reserves therefor.

Such funding or refunding bonds shall be negotiable instruments within the provisions and intent of the negotiable instruments law of this state, and the tax revenue of the county may not be used to pay, secure, or guarantee the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds.

The county may exchange such funding or refunding bonds for the bonds, and any coupons being funded or refunded, or it may sell such funding or refunding bonds in the manner, at such price and at such rate or rates of interest as the legislative authority shall deem to be for the best interest of the county and its inhabitants, either at public or private sale.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the terms, conditions, covenants, issuance, and sale of revenue bonds shall be applicable to such funding or refunding bonds except as may be otherwise specifically provided in this section.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 82; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 51; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 28; 1965 c 142 s 6.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.